Nebraska, session 109, LB1250.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1250 LB1250
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) A city of the primary class, city of the first
class, city of the second class, or village may sell or transfer any
waterworks, sewer system, or water system owned by such city or village
to an Indian tribe if the following requirements are met:
(a) The waterworks, sewer system, or water system must be located or
operating in its entirety within the tribal lands of such Indian tribe;
and
(b) The sale or transfer must be approved by the qualified electors
of the city or village at a general or special election described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The governing body of the city or village seeking to sell or
transfer any waterworks, sewer system, or water system under this section
shall submit such question or proposition, in the usual manner, to the
qualified electors of such city or village at any general city or village
election or at any special city or village election and may submit the
proposition in connection with any city or village special election
called for any other purpose, and the votes cast thereon shall be
canvassed and the result found and declared as in any other city or
village election.
(3) For purposes of this section, Indian tribe means an Indian tribe
or band which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by
the state.
-2-